Hawaii statutes.
§352-10 Circuit court disposition of
offenders under eighteen years. The circuit court may commit all offenders
under eighteen years of age, duly convicted before the court, to the Hawaii
youth correctional facilities in all cases where the court deems the sentence
to be more suitable than the punishment otherwise authorized by law. In such a
case, when the term of confinement ordered by the court extends beyond the
offender's eighteenth birthday, the offender shall, upon reaching the age of
eighteen, be committed to the custody of the department of public safety for
completion of the sentence. Persons committed to the Hawaii youth correctional
facilities under this section may be furloughed or paroled by the director,
unless the commitment order issued by the court requires prior approval by the
court or unless the offender is subject to a mandatory term of imprisonment
which term has not yet expired. [L 1980, c 303, pt of §8(1); am L 1997, c 318,
§1]

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next